Colorado, session 2026A, HB1173.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Capital construction information technology
appropriations for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session
Laws of Colorado 2025, amend section 4 of chapter 476, (SB 25- 206), as
follows:
Section 4. Capital Construction Information Technology
Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL CAPITAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL CONSTRUCTION FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
FUND
$ $ $ $ $ $
PART I
STATE AGENCIES
(1) DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Offender Records Management 3,023,613 3,023,613
Pharmacy System Replacement 1,467,321 1,208,710 258,611a
4,490,934
a This amount shall be from the Medications for Opioid Use Disorder (OUD) and Medicaid Care Coordination in DOC Facilities Grant.
(2) DEPARTMENT OF EARLY CHILDHOOD
Child Care Assistance Program 1,781,556 194,190a 1,587,366b
a This amount shall be from local funds and reflects the local share of costs of administering the Child Care Assistance Program and the local share of child care subsidies. The (L)
and the (I) notation apply to this amount.
b This amount shall be from Child Care Development Funds.
(3) DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
School Finance System
Modernization 3,000,000 3,000,000
Statewide Facility Assessments 1,470,000 1,470,000a
4,470,000
a This amount shall be from the Public School Capital Construction Assistance Fund created in Section 22-43.7-104 (1), C.R.S.
(4) DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING
Colorado Benefits Management
System Reprocurement 4,784,276 897,817 3,886,459(I)
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1173

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL CAPITAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL CONSTRUCTION FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
FUND
$ $ $ $ $ $
Social Health Information
Exchange Project 8,139,343 1,203,920 6,935,423(I)
12,923,619
(5) JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
Courts & Probation Case
Management System 4,728,771 4,728,771a
a This amount shall be from the Judicial Department Information Technology Cash Fund created in Section 13-32-114 (1), C.R.S.
(6) DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT
CoCo Replacement System 12,140,213 12,140,213a
a This amount shall be from the Major Medical Insurance Fund created in Section 8-46-202 (1)(a), C.R.S., the Subsequent Injury Fund created in Section 8-46-101 (1)(b)(I), C.R.S.,
or the Workers' Compensation Cash Fund created in Section 8-44-112 (7)(a), C.R.S.
(7) DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Colorado Oil and Gas Information
System 2,000,535 2,000,535a
a This amount shall be from Energy and Carbon Management Cash Fund created in Section 24-60-122 (5)(a), C.R.S.
(8) DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL
Payroll Modernization 13,731,158 13,731,158
OAC Court Management System 3,375,426 3,375,426a
Statewide Procurement System 1,420,957 1,420,957b
18,527,541
a This amount shall be from the Administrative Courts Cash Fund created in Section 24-30-1001 (3), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Supplier Database Cash Fund created in Section 24-102-202.5 (2)(a), C.R.S.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1173

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL CAPITAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL CONSTRUCTION FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
FUND
$ $ $ $ $ $
(9) DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH
Stationary Sources Modernization 2,000,000 2,000,000
Colorado WIC System Upgrade 1,933,648 581,657 1,351,991(I)
3,933,648
(10) DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY
Records Utilization Upgrade 1,635,581 1,635,581
Colorado Gang Database 250,000 250,000
COLORADO CRIME INFORMATION
CENTER FBI SYSTEM COMPLIANCE 735,000 735,000a
1,885,581
2,620,581
a THIS AMOUNT SHALL BE FROM THE COLORADO BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION IDENTIFICATION UNIT FUND CREATED IN SECTION 24-33.5-426, C.R.S.
(11) DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
MED Seed to Sale Tracking 2,980,000 2,980,000
(12) DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES
REIMAGINING COLORADO'S
BENEFITS ELIGIBILITY SYSTEM 19,462,080 7,363,145 12,098,935(I)
69,862,398
90,059,478
TOTALS PART I
(STATE AGENCIES) $69,862,398 $30,512,456 $21,954,666 $3,634,037 $13,761,239
$90,059,478 $37,875,601 $22,689,666 $25,860,174
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1173

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL CAPITAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL CONSTRUCTION FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
FUND
$ $ $ $ $ $
PART II
INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION
(1) DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION
(A) Auraria Higher Education Center
Network Infrastructure
Modernization 3,457,666 3,457,666
(B) Northwestern Community College
South Campus Redundancy
Upgrade 571,163 571,163
4,028,829
TOTALS PART II
(INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER
EDUCATION) $4,028,829 $4,028,829
GRAND TOTALS
(INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY PROJECTS) $73,891,227 $34,541,285 $21,954,666 $3,634,037 $13,761,239a
$94,088,307 $41,904,430 $22,689,666 $25,860,174a
a This amount contains an (I) notation.
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1173

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL CAPITAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL CONSTRUCTION FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
FUND
$ $ $ $ $ $
SECTION 2. Capital construction information technology appropriations for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024. In Session Laws of Colorado 2024, section 4 of
chapter 519, (HB 24-1430), amend Part I (3), Part II (1)(B), and the affected totals, as Part I and the affected totals are amended by Session Laws of Colorado 2025, section 1 of chapter
475, (SB 25-112), as follows:
Section 4. Capital Construction Information Technology Appropriation.
PART I
STATE AGENCIES
(3) DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES
Leveraging Technology for
Seamless Human Services 16,516,500 3,716,625 12,799,875(I)
Office of Civil and Forensic Mental
Health Information Management
Systems & Data Reporting 2,205,218 2,205,218
18,721,718
TOTALS PART I
(STATE AGENCIES) $140,817,018 $69,072,489 $13,186,812 $276,088 $58,281,629
$124,300,518 $65,355,864 $45,481,754
PART II
INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION
(1) DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION
(B) Metropolitan State University
Reimagining the Campus Digital
Experience 9,256,163 8,406,163 850,000a
11,706,163 3,300,000a
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1173

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL CAPITAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL CONSTRUCTION FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
FUND
$ $ $ $ $ $
a This amount shall be from unrestricted institutional reserves.
TOTALS PART II
(INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER
EDUCATION) $18,833,302 $17,764,180 $1,069,122
$21,283,302 $3,519,122
GRAND TOTALS
(INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY PROJECTS) $159,650,320 $86,836,669 $14,255,934 $276,088 $58,281,629a
$145,583,820 $83,120,044 $16,705,934 $45,481,754a
a This amount contains an (I) notation.
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1173

SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1173